Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2003.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 62 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 34MADE IN AMERICASec.3401. Definitions.3402. Flags.§ 3401. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of General Services of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617 § 3402. Flags.(a) Requirement.--After the effective date of this subsection, a flag of the United States or of Pennsylvania procured by the department for public display must be:(1) produced in the United States; and(2) constructed from materials sourced from within the United States.(b) Label.--A flag procured under subsection (a) must include the words "Made in America" on the flag's identifying label.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB2003PN2559 - 2 - 1234567891011